Illinois, session 104th, SB1612.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Conservation District Act is amended by 5changing Section 6 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 410/6)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 7106)7    Sec. 6. Officers and employees. As soon as possible after 8the initial election or the initial appointments, as the case 9may be, the trustees shall organize by selecting from their 10members a president, secretary, treasurer, and other officers 11as are deemed necessary, who shall hold office for 2 years in 12the case of an elected board, or the fiscal year in which 13elected in the case of an appointed board, and until their 14successors are selected and qualify. Three trustees shall 15constitute a quorum of the board for the transaction of 16business if the district has 5 trustees. If the district has 7 17trustees, 4 trustees shall constitute a quorum of the board 18for the transaction of business. The board shall hold regular 19monthly meetings. Special meetings may be called by the 20president and shall be called on the request of a majority of 21members, as may be required.22    The board shall provide for the proper and safe keeping of 23its permanent records and for the recording of the corporate   SB1612 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06124 RTM 16157 b1action of the district. It shall keep a proper system of 2accounts showing a true and accurate record of its receipts 3and disbursements, and it shall cause an annual audit to be 4made of its books, records, and accounts.5    The records of the district shall be subject to public 6inspection at all reasonable hours and under regulations as 7the board may prescribe.8    The district shall annually make a full and complete 9report to the county board of each county within the district 10and to the Department of Natural Resources of its transactions 11and operations for the preceding year. The report shall 12contain a full statement of its receipts, disbursements, and 13the program of work for the period covered, and may include 14recommendations as may be deemed advisable.15    Executive or ministerial duties may be delegated to one or 16more trustees or to an authorized officer, employee, agent, 17attorney, or other representative of the district.18    All officers and employees authorized to receive or retain 19the custody of money or to sign vouchers, checks, warrants, or 20evidences of indebtedness binding upon the district shall 21furnish surety bond for the faithful performance of their 22duties and the faithful accounting for all moneys that may 23come into their hands in an amount to be fixed and in a form to 24be approved by the board.25    All contracts for supplies, material, or work involving an 26expenditure in excess of $60,000 for supplies or materials and   SB1612 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06124 RTM 16157 b1$30,000 for work, or a lower amount for any contract for 2supplies, material, or work if required by board policy, shall 3be let to the lowest responsible bidder, after due 4advertisement, excepting work requiring personal confidence or 5necessary supplies under the control of monopolies, where 6competitive bidding is impossible, or as otherwise provided in 7the Forest Preserve District and Conservation District 8Design-Build Authorization Act. All contracts for supplies, 9material, or work shall be signed by the president of the board 10and by any other officer as the board in its discretion may 11designate.12(Source: P.A. 102-460, eff. 6-1-22.) 13    Section 10. The Downstate Forest Preserve District Act is 14amended by changing Section 8 as follows: 15    (70 ILCS 805/8)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 6315)16    Sec. 8. Powers and duties of corporate authority and 17officers; contracts; salaries. 18    (a) The board shall be the corporate authority of such 19forest preserve district and shall have power to pass and 20enforce all necessary ordinances, rules and regulations for 21the management of the property and conduct of the business of 22such district. The president of such board shall have power to 23appoint such employees as may be necessary. In counties with 24population of less than 3,000,000, within 60 days after their   SB1612 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06124 RTM 16157 b1selection the commissioners appointed under the provisions of 2Section 3a of this Act shall organize by selecting from their 3members a president, vice president, secretary, treasurer and 4such other officers as are deemed necessary who shall hold 5office for the fiscal year in which elected and until their 6successors are selected and qualify. In the one district in 7existence on July 1, 1977, that is managed by an appointed 8board of commissioners, the incumbent president and the other 9officers appointed in the manner as originally prescribed in 10this Act shall hold such offices until the completion of their 11respective terms or in the case of the officers other than 12president until their successors are appointed by said 13president, but in all cases not to extend beyond January 1, 141980 and until their successors are selected and qualify. 15Thereafter, the officers shall be selected in the manner as 16prescribed in this Section except that their first term of 17office shall not expire until June 30, 1981 and until their 18successors are selected and qualify.19    (a-5) An officer selected pursuant to subsection (a) may 20be removed, with or without cause, upon a motion adopted by an 21affirmative vote of four-fifths of the board of the forest 22preserve district. Upon adoption of a motion to remove an 23officer: (i) the office becomes vacant and the former 24officer's compensation shall be prorated to the date the 25motion was approved; (ii) if the officer removed is the 26president then the vice president immediately assumes the   SB1612 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06124 RTM 16157 b1duties of the president without president compensation and, if 2the officer removed is the vice president, treasurer, or 3secretary, then the president shall select an interim 4appointee who shall serve until the next regularly scheduled 5forest preserve district board meeting; and (iii) a new 6officer shall be selected at the next regularly scheduled 7forest preserve district board meeting. An officer removed 8under this Section maintains his or her status as a member of 9the forest preserve district board. 10    (b) In any county, city, village, incorporated town or 11sanitary district where the corporate authorities act as the 12governing body of a forest preserve district, the person 13exercising the powers of the president of the board shall have 14power to appoint a secretary and an assistant secretary and 15treasurer and an assistant treasurer and such other officers 16and such employees as may be necessary. The assistant 17secretary and assistant treasurer shall perform the duties of 18the secretary and treasurer, respectively in case of death of 19such officers or when such officers are unable to perform the 20duties of their respective offices. All contracts for 21supplies, material, or work involving an expenditure in excess 22of $60,000 for supplies or materials and $30,000 for work, or a 23lower amount for any contract for supplies, material, or work 24if required by board policy, shall be let to the lowest 25responsible bidder, after advertising at least once in one or 26more newspapers of general circulation within the district,   SB1612 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 06124 RTM 16157 b1excepting work requiring personal confidence or necessary 2supplies under the control of monopolies, where competitive 3bidding is impossible, or as otherwise provided in the Forest 4Preserve District and Conservation District Design-Build 5Authorization Act. Contracts for supplies, material, or work 6involving an expenditure of $60,000 for supplies or materials 7and $30,000 for work, or a lower amount for any contract for 8supplies, material, or work if required by board policy, or 9less may be let without advertising for bids, but whenever 10practicable, at least 3 competitive bids shall be obtained 11before letting such contract. All contracts for supplies, 12material or work shall be signed by the president of the board 13of commissioners or by any such other officer as the board in 14its discretion may designate.15    (c) The president of any board of commissioners appointed 16under the provisions of Section 3a of this Act shall receive a 17salary not to exceed the sum of $2500 per annum and the salary 18of other members of the board so appointed shall not exceed 19$1500 per annum. Salaries of the commissioners, officers and 20employees shall be fixed by ordinance.21    (d) Whenever a forest preserve district owns any personal 22property that, in the opinion of three-fifths of the members 23of the board of commissioners, is no longer necessary, useful 24to, or for the best interests of the forest preserve district, 25then three-fifths of the members of the board, at any regular 26meeting or any special meeting called for that purpose by an   SB1612 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 06124 RTM 16157 b1ordinance or resolution that includes a general description of 2the personal property, may authorize the conveyance or sale of 3that personal property in any manner that they may designate, 4with or without advertising the sale. 5(Source: P.A. 101-544, eff. 8-23-19; 102-460, eff. 6-1-22.) 6    Section 15. The Park District Code is amended by changing 7Section 8-1 as follows: 8    (70 ILCS 1205/8-1)  (from Ch. 105, par. 8-1)9    Sec. 8-1. General corporate powers. Every park district 10shall, from the time of its organization, be a body corporate 11and politic by the name set forth in the petition for its 12organization, the specific name set forth in this Code, or the 13name it may adopt under Section 8-9 and shall have and exercise 14the following powers:15        (a) To adopt a corporate seal and alter the same at 16    pleasure; to sue and be sued; and to contract in 17    furtherance of any of its corporate purposes.18        (b)(1) To acquire by gift, legacy, grant or purchase, 19    or by condemnation in the manner provided for the exercise 20    of the power of eminent domain under the Eminent Domain 21    Act, any and all real estate, or rights therein necessary 22    for building, laying out, extending, adorning and 23    maintaining any such parks, boulevards and driveways, or 24    for effecting any of the powers or purposes granted under   SB1612 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 06124 RTM 16157 b1    this Code as its board may deem proper, whether such lands 2    be located within or without such district; but no park 3    district, except as provided in paragraph (2) of this 4    subsection, shall have any power of condemnation in the 5    manner provided for the exercise of the power of eminent 6    domain under the Eminent Domain Act or otherwise as to any 7    real estate, lands, riparian rights or estate, or other 8    property situated outside of such district, but shall only 9    have power to acquire the same by gift, legacy, grant or 10    purchase, and such district shall have the same control of 11    and power over lands so acquired without the district as 12    over parks, boulevards and driveways within such district.13        (2) In addition to the powers granted in paragraph (1) 14    of subsection (b), a park district located in more than 15    one county, the majority of its territory located in a 16    county over 450,000 in population and none of its 17    territory located in a county over 1,000,000 in 18    population, shall have condemnation power in the manner 19    provided for the exercise of the power of eminent domain 20    under the Eminent Domain Act or as otherwise granted by 21    law as to any and all real estate situated up to one mile 22    outside of such district which is not within the 23    boundaries of another park district.24        (c) To acquire by gift, legacy or purchase any 25    personal property necessary for its corporate purposes 26    provided that all contracts for supplies, materials, or   SB1612 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 06124 RTM 16157 b1    work involving an expenditure in excess of $60,000 for 2    supplies or materials and $30,000 for work, or a lower 3    amount for any contract for supplies, material, or work if 4    required by board policy, shall be let to the lowest 5    responsible bidder after due advertisement. No district 6    shall be required to accept a bid that does not meet the 7    district's established specifications, terms of delivery, 8    quality, and serviceability requirements. Contracts which, 9    by their nature, are not adapted to award by competitive 10    bidding, such as contracts for the services of individuals 11    possessing a high degree of professional skill where the 12    ability or fitness of the individual plays an important 13    part, contracts for the printing of finance committee 14    reports and departmental reports, contracts for the 15    printing or engraving of bonds, tax warrants and other 16    evidences of indebtedness, contracts for utility services 17    such as water, light, heat, telephone or telegraph, 18    contracts for fuel (such as diesel, gasoline, oil, 19    aviation, or propane), lubricants, or other petroleum 20    products, contracts for the use, purchase, delivery, 21    movement, or installation of data processing equipment, 22    software, or services and telecommunications and 23    interconnect equipment, software, or services, contracts 24    for duplicating machines and supplies, contracts for goods 25    or services procured from another governmental agency, 26    purchases of equipment previously owned by some entity   SB1612 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 06124 RTM 16157 b1    other than the district itself, and contracts for the 2    purchase of magazines, books, periodicals, pamphlets and 3    reports are not subject to competitive bidding. Contracts 4    for emergency expenditures are also exempt from 5    competitive bidding when the emergency expenditure is 6    approved by 3/4 of the members of the board.7        All competitive bids for contracts involving an 8    expenditure in excess of $60,000 for supplies or materials 9    and $30,000 for work, or a lower amount for any contract 10    for supplies, material, or work if required by board 11    policy, must be sealed by the bidder and must be opened by 12    a member or employee of the park board at a public bid 13    opening at which the contents of the bids must be 14    announced. Each bidder must receive at least 3 days notice 15    of the time and place of the bid opening.16        For purposes of this subsection, "due advertisement" 17    includes, but is not limited to, at least one public 18    notice at least 10 days before the bid date in a newspaper 19    published in the district or, if no newspaper is published 20    in the district, in a newspaper of general circulation in 21    the area of the district.22        (d) To pass all necessary ordinances, rules and 23    regulations for the proper management and conduct of the 24    business of the board and district and to establish by 25    ordinance all needful rules and regulations for the 26    government and protection of parks, boulevards and   SB1612 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 06124 RTM 16157 b1    driveways and other property under its jurisdiction, and 2    to effect the objects for which such districts are formed.3        (e) To prescribe such fines and penalties for the 4    violation of ordinances as it shall deem proper not 5    exceeding $1,000 for any one offense, which fines and 6    penalties may be recovered by an action in the name of such 7    district in the circuit court for the county in which such 8    violation occurred. The park district may also seek in the 9    action, in addition to or instead of fines and penalties, 10    an order that the offender be required to make restitution 11    for damage resulting from violations, and the court shall 12    grant such relief where appropriate. The procedure in such 13    actions shall be the same as that provided by law for like 14    actions for the violation of ordinances in cities 15    organized under the general laws of this State, and 16    offenders may be imprisoned for non-payment of fines and 17    costs in the same manner as in such cities. All fines when 18    collected shall be paid into the treasury of such 19    district.20        (f) To manage and control all officers and property of 21    such districts and to provide for joint ownership with one 22    or more cities, villages or incorporated towns of real and 23    personal property used for park purposes by one or more 24    park districts. In case of joint ownership, the terms of 25    the agreement shall be fair, just and equitable to all 26    parties and shall be set forth in a written agreement   SB1612 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 06124 RTM 16157 b1    entered into by the corporate authorities of each 2    participating district, city, village or incorporated 3    town.4        (g) To secure grants and loans, or either, from the 5    United States Government, or any agency or agencies 6    thereof, for financing the acquisition or purchase of any 7    and all real estate, or rights therein, or for effecting 8    any of the powers or purposes granted under this Code as 9    its Board may deem proper.10        (h) To establish fees for the use of facilities and 11    recreational programs of the districts and to derive 12    revenue from non-resident fees from their operations. Fees 13    charged non-residents of such district need not be the 14    same as fees charged to residents of the district. 15    Charging fees or deriving revenue from the facilities and 16    recreational programs shall not affect the right to assert 17    or utilize any defense or immunity, common law or 18    statutory, available to the districts or their employees.19        (i) To make contracts for a term exceeding one year, 20    but not to exceed 3 years, notwithstanding any provision 21    of this Code to the contrary, relating to: (1) the 22    employment of a park director, superintendent, 23    administrator, engineer, health officer, land planner, 24    finance director, attorney, police chief, or other officer 25    who requires technical training or knowledge; (2) the 26    employment of outside professional consultants such as   SB1612 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 06124 RTM 16157 b1    engineers, doctors, land planners, auditors, attorneys, or 2    other professional consultants who require technical 3    training or knowledge; (3) the provision of data 4    processing equipment and services; and (4) the purchase of 5    energy from a utility or an alternative retail electric 6    supplier. With respect to any contract made under this 7    subsection (i), the corporate authorities shall include in 8    the annual appropriation ordinance for each fiscal year an 9    appropriation of a sum of money sufficient to pay the 10    amount which, by the terms of the contract, is to become 11    due and payable during that fiscal year.12        (j) To enter into licensing or management agreements 13    with not-for-profit corporations organized under the laws 14    of this State to operate park district facilities if the 15    corporation covenants to use the facilities to provide 16    public park or recreational programs for youth.17(Source: P.A. 101-304, eff. 8-9-19; 102-999, eff. 5-27-22.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.